Illinois, session 104th, SB1576.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by adding Section 51-26 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/1-26 new)7    Sec. 1-26. "I Voted" Sticker Contest. 8    (a) The "I Voted" Sticker Commission is created. The 9purposes of the Commission are to develop guidelines for the 10"I Voted" Sticker Contest and to select 10 designs to be used 11by election authorities in this State for the 2026 General 12Election.13    (b) The Commission shall consist of the following members:14        (1) the Secretary of State or the Secretary of State's 15    designee, who shall serve as Chair of the Commission;16        (2) 3 members appointed by the Governor;17        (3) 4 members appointed by the President of the 18    Senate, not more than one of whom may be a current member 19    of the General Assembly;20        (4) 4 members appointed by the Speaker of the House of 21    Representatives, not more than one of whom may be a 22    current member of the General Assembly;23        (5) 4 members appointed by the Minority Leader of the   SB1576- 2 -LRB104 09988 SPS 20058 b1    Senate, not more than one of whom may be a current member 2    of the General Assembly;3        (6) 4 members appointed by the Minority Leader of the 4    House of Representatives, not more than one of whom may be 5    a current member of the General Assembly;6        (7) the State Superintendent of Education or the 7    Superintendent's designee; and8        (8) the Chairperson of the Board of the Illinois State 9    Museum or the Chairperson's designee.10    (c) The Commission shall have the following duties:11        (1) to establish and adopt goals and guiding 12    principles for the "I Voted" Sticker Contest;13        (2) to establish a process for the submission of 14    proposed designs for the "I Voted" Sticker Contest and 15    guidelines for the assessment of those proposed designs;16        (3) to create a publicly accessibly website that 17    provides:18            (A) the guidelines for submissions to the "I 19        Voted" Sticker Contest;20            (B) a timeline and explanation of the process to 21        be used by the Commission to select the winning "I 22        Voted" sticker;23            (C) an online suggestion box through which 24        residents can offer submissions to the "I Voted" 25        Sticker Contest that shall close no later than 26        November 1, 2025;  SB1576- 3 -LRB104 09988 SPS 20058 b1            (D) a survey function through which residents can 2        vote on "I Voted" Sticker designs submitted for the 3        contest;4            (E) for a voting period for residents to use the 5        survey function to vote for their favorite "I Voted" 6        sticker submissions that comply with this Section; and7            (F) after the final 10 submissions are selected, a 8        display of the 10 designs;9        (4) to engage in a public awareness campaign with the 10    design community and advocacy groups, as well as schools, 11    universities, and public libraries in this State, 12    concerning the "I Voted" Sticker Contest;13        (5) to select, on or before January 1, 2026, a group of 14    no more than 50 submissions that:15            (A) engage voters; and16            (B) adhere to the guiding principles established 17        by the Commission established under paragraph (1);18        (6) develop a review and selection process for 19    submissions that incorporates the input of children and 20    young people in the State;21        (7) on or before February 2, 2026, to submit to the 22    General Assembly a written report that describes:23            (A) the submissions provided to the Commission 24        through the "I Voted" Sticker Contest;25            (B) the process used by the Commission to review 26        the submissions; and  SB1576- 4 -LRB104 09988 SPS 20058 b1            (C) the group of no more than 50 submissions 2        selected by the Commission for voting;3        (8) to open a voting period for residents to use the 4    survey function to vote for their favorite "I Voted" 5    sticker submissions; and6        (9) to select, on or before July 1, 2026, the 10 7    designs that will be used by election authorities in this 8    State State for the 2026 General Election.9    (c) The appointing authorities shall make appointments to 10the Commission as soon as practicable after the effective date 11of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, and the 12Chair of the Commission shall convene the first meeting of the 13Commission no later than June 30, 2025. Subsequent meetings of 14the Commission shall convene at the call of the Chair of the 15Commission. A majority of all the appointed members of the 16Commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of 17business, and all recommendations of the Commission shall 18require approval of a majority of the members of the 19Commission. Meetings of the Commission are subject to the Open 20Meetings Act.21    (d) Members of the Commission shall serve without 22compensation.23    (e) The State Board of Elections shall provide 24administrative and other support to the Commission.25    (f) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027. 26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   SB1576- 5 -LRB104 09988 SPS 20058 b1becoming law.